District of Columbia statutes.
3-1305

Conflict of interest.

No member of the Board, Chairperson of the Board, Executive Director, or employee of the Board during their tenure of appointment or employment shall: Hold any other elected or appointed position; or have, directly or indirectly, individually or as a member of a partnership, or as an officer, director, or shareholder of a corporation, any interest whatsoever in any lottery or daily numbers game, bingo, raffles enterprise, or Monte Carlo night party or in the ownership or leasing of any equipment, property, or premises used by or for any lottery or daily numbers game, bingo, raffles enterprise, or Monte Carlo night party.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(b)(1), 34 DCR 900

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2505.